Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.015

Declaration of policy.

A credit union is a cooperative society organized under this chapter as a nonprofit corporation for the purposes of promoting thrift among its members and creating a source of credit for them at fair and reasonable rates of interest.

The director is the state's credit union regulatory authority whose purpose is to protect members' financial interests, the integrity of credit unions as cooperative institutions, and the interests of the general public, and to ensure that credit unions remain viable and competitive in this state.

[ 1997 c 397 s 3. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 69; 1994 c 92 s 176; 1984 c 31 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.